Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202053-194.03
Transportation of liquor into state; forbidden; when; penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to transport, import, bring, ship, or cause to be transported, imported, brought, or shipped into the State of Nebraska for the personal use of the possessor, his or her family, or guests a quantity of alcoholic liquor in excess of nine liters in any one calendar month.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a person importing alcoholic liquor from a holder of a retail direct sales shipping license or its equivalent, which alcoholic liquor is for personal use or for use by such person’s family or guests, if the total amount imported by such person in any one calendar year does not exceed one hundred eight liters.

(3) Alcoholic liquor transported, imported, brought, or shipped into the State of Nebraska in violation of this section shall be seized by the commission and disposed of in the manner provided for contraband. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1985, LB 359, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1292, § 9;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 30.